en: Kefta substitutes, Kefta substituts
fr: Substituts des kefta

en: Frikandel substitutes
de: Frikadellen-Ersatzprodukte
fr: Substituts des fricadelles
hr: Zamjene za frikandel

en: Breaded cutlets substitutes, Schnitzel substitutes, Vegetarian schnitzels
da: Vegetariske schnitzler, Vegetarisk schnitzel
fr: Susbtituts des escalopes panés, Schnitzel substituts
hr: Zamjene za pohane kotlete
nb: Vegetarianske snitsler, Vegetariske snitsler
nn: Vegetarianske snitslar, Vegetariske snitslar
pl: Zastępniki kotletów panierowanych
sv: Vegetarianska schnitzlar, Vegetariska schnitzlar, Vegoschnitzlar, Vegoschnitzel

en: Breaded cutlets substitutes with cheese, Cheese schnitzel substitutes, Vegetarian cheese schnitzels
da: Vegetariske osteschnitzler, Vegetarisk osteschnitzel
nb: Vegetarianske ostesnitsler, Vegetariske ostesnitsler
nn: Vegetarianske ostesnitslar, Vegetariske ostesnitslar
sv: Vegetarianska ostschnitzlar, Vegetariska ostschnitzlar, Vego ostschnitzlar, Vego ostschnitzel

en: Plant-based breaded cutlets, Vegan breaded cutlets, Plant-based schnitzels, Vegan schnitzels
da: Plantebaserede schnitzler, Veganske schnitzler, Vegansk schnitzel
nb: Plantebaserte snitsler, Veganske snitsler
nn: Plantebaserte snitslar, Veganske snitslar
sv: Växtbaserade schnitzlar, Veganska schnitzlar, Vegansk schnitzel

en: Vegetarian cordons bleus
es: Cordones azules vegetarianos
fi: Kasviscordons bleu
fr: Cordons bleus végétariens
hr: Vegetarijanski cordons bleus
hu: Vegetáriánus cordons bleu
it: Cordon bleu vegetariani
ja: ベジタリアンコルドンブルー
nl: Vegetarische cordons bleus
pl: Wegetariańskie cordons bleus
ru: Вегетарианские кордоны бле

en: Vegetarian nuggets, veggie nuggets
da: Vegetariske nuggets
de: Vegetarische Nuggets
es: Nuggets vegetarianos
fi: Kavisnugetit
fr: Nuggets végétariens
hr: Vegetarijanski nuggets
it: Nugget vegetarianeìi
nl: Vegetarische nuggets
pl: Nuggetsy wegetariańskie

en: Frozen vegetarian nuggets
da: Frosne vegetariske nuggets
fr: Nuggets végétariens surgelés

en: Nuggets from soy and wheat proteins, Soybean and wheat-based nuggets (vegan)
fr: Nuggets à base de protéines de soja et blé, Nuggets soja et blé (convient aux véganes ou végétaliens) préemballé
hr: Nuggets od proteina soje i pšenice
pl: Nuggetsy z białka sojowego lub pszennego

en: Vegan nuggets, plant-based nuggets, plant based nuggets
da: Veganske nuggets
fr: Nuggets végans, Nuggets végétaux
hr: Veganski nuggets
nl: Veganistische nuggets, Vegan-nuggets
pl: Nuggetsy roślinne, Nuggetsy wegańskie
sv: Veganska nuggets

en: Frozen vegan nuggets
da: Frosne veganske nuggets
sv: Frysta veganska nuggets

en: Breaded fish substitutes, Vegetarian breaded fish substituts
de: Panierter Fischersatz, Vegetarischer panierter Fischersatz
es: Sustitutos de pescado empanado, Sustitutos vegetarianos de pescado empanado
fr: Substituts du poisson pané
hr: Pohane zamjene za ribu
pl: Zamienniki panierowanego ryby, Zamienniki panierowanego ryby dla wegetarian

en: Vegetarian grounds, Veggie grounds
de: Vegetarisches Gehacktes, Gemüsehack, Vegetarisches Hackfleisch
fr: Hachés végétaux
hr: Vegetarijanska podloga
pl: Mielone wegetariańskie, Wegetariańskie mielone

en: Plant-based grounds, Plant-based minces, Vegan grounds, Vegan minces
fr: Hachés végétales

en: Soy-based grounds, Soy-based minces, Soy-based minced prepacked
fr: Hachés végétales à base de soja

en: Frozen vegetarian grounds, Frozen veggie grounds
fr: Hachés végétaux surgelés

en: Frozen plant-based grounds, Frozen plant-based minces, Frozen vegan grounds, Frozen vegan minces
fr: Hachés végétales surgelés

en: Vegetarian patties, Veggie patties, veggie burger patties, vegetarian cutlet, vegetarian steaks
de: Gemüsebratling, Vegetarische Burger
es: Filetes vegetales para hamburguesas
fi: kasvishampurilaispihvit
fr: Galettes végétariennes, Steaks végétariens, steaks végétariens pour hamburgers
hr: Vegetarijanske polpete
nl: Plantaardige steaks voor hamburgers
pl: Wegetariańskie kotlety, Wegetariańskie burgery

en: Patties from soy and or wheat proteins, Plant-based patty or steak from wheat and soybean (vegan) prepacked
fr: Galettes à base de protéines de soja et ou blé, Galette ou pavé au blé et soja (convient aux véganes ou végétaliens) préemballé
hr: Pljeskavice od sojinih i/ili pšeničnih proteina
pl: Kotlety z białka sojowego lub pszennego

en: Vegan patties, vegan burger patties, Vegetable escalope, vegan cutlet, vegan steaks
fr: Galettes véganes, Steaks végétaux, steaks végétaux pour hamburgers
hr: Veganske polpete
pl: Kotlety wegańskie, Kotlety roślinne, Burgery wegańskie, Burgery roślinne